src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k7x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: brýskur
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: brýsk
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: brýski
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: brýskar
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: brýskar
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: brýskar
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: brýskum
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: brýska
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: brýskurin
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: brýskin
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: brýskinum
    brýskur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: brýskarins
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: brýskarnir
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: brýskarnar
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: brýskunum
    brýskur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: brýskanna
